California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
(B) Vehicles that pay for tolls electronically or through other non-cash methods. The authority may charge differential rates based on the chosen method.

(2) The authority shall provide a 50-percent discount on the amount of the toll increase approved pursuant to Section 30923 on the second bridge crossing for those commuters using a two-axle vehicle who pay tolls electronically or through other noncash methods and who cross two bridges specified in Section 30910 during commute hours. The authority shall establish reasonable and practical operating rules to implement
 this paragraph.

(d) If the authority establishes high-occupancy vehicle lane fee discounts or access for vehicles classified by the authority as high-occupancy vehicles for any bridge or segments of a highway that connect to the bridge, the authority shall establish the occupancy requirements that shall apply on each segment of highway that connects with that bridge, in consultation with the department.

(e) All tolls referred to in this section and Sections 30916, 31010, and 31011 may be treated by the authority as a single revenue source for accounting and administrative purposes and for the purposes of any bond indenture or resolution and any agreement entered into pursuant to Section 5922 of the Government Code.

(f) It is the intent of the Legislature that the authority should consider the needs and requirements of both its electronic and cash-paying customers when it designates toll payment options at the toll plazas for the toll bridges under its jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 650, Sec. 10.   (SB 595)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

30919.

(a) Consistent with its adopted regional transportation plan, after the requirements for debt service on the outstanding toll bridge revenue bonds have been met, the Metropolitan Transportation Commission shall allocate the revenues identified in subdivision (b) of Section 30913 to eligible public entities and to the department.

(b) The revenues expended pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 30914 shall be expended on rail extension and improvement projects
 designed to reduce vehicular traffic congestion on the San Francisco-Oakland Bay Bridge. Seventy percent of the revenues shall be expended on rail extensions and improvement projects in the Counties of Alameda and Contra Costa, including, but not limited to, extending the regional rail system in the Concord-Antioch, Fremont-San Jose, and the Bayfair-Livermore rail transit corridors. The remaining 30 percent shall be expended on rail extensions and improvement projects in the City and County of San Francisco and the Counties of San Mateo and Santa Clara.

(c) The Metropolitan Transportation Commission may commit to multiyear allocations and expenditures for projects over extended time periods to maximize funding opportunities and project progress.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 715, Sec. 71.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

30920.

The authority may issue toll bridge revenue bonds to finance any or all of the projects, including those specified in Sections 30913, 30914, and 30914.7, if the issuance of the bonds does not adversely affect the minimum amount of toll revenue proceeds designated in Section 30913 and in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of, and subdivision (b) of, Section 30914 for rail extension and improvement projects and transit projects to reduce vehicular traffic. A determination of the authority that a specific project or projects shall have no adverse effect will be binding and conclusive in all respects.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 650, Sec. 11.   (SB 595)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

30921.

(a) The toll rate for vehicles crossing the bridges described in Section 30916 shall not be increased to the rate described in subdivision (b) of Section 30916 prior to the availability of the results of a special election to be held in the City and County of San Francisco and the Counties of Alameda, Contra Costa, Marin, San Mateo, Santa Clara, and Solano to determine whether the residents of those counties and of the City and County of San Francisco approve a toll increase in the amount of one dollar ($1) per vehicle. The revenue derived from
 this toll increase shall be used to finance capital outlay for construction improvements, the acquisition of transit vehicles, transit operating assistance, and other improvement projects to reduce congestion and to improve travel options on the bridge corridors as is fiscally practicable.

(b) Notwithstanding any provision of the Elections Code, the board of supervisors of the City and County of San Francisco and of each of the counties described in subdivision (a) shall call a special election to be conducted in the City and County of San Francisco and in each of the counties that shall be consolidated with the March 2, 2004, primary election. The following question shall be submitted to the voters as Regional Measure 2 and stated separately in the ballot from state and local measures: “Shall voters authorize a Regional Traffic Relief Plan that does the following:

(1) Directs
 revenues generated through the collection of bridge tolls to provide the following projects:

(A) Expand and extend BART.

(B) New transbay commuter rail crossing south of the San Francisco-Oakland Bay Bridge.

(C) Comprehensive Regional Express bus network.

(D) New expanded ferry service.

(E) Better connections between BART, buses, ferries, and rail.

(2) Approves a one dollar ($1) toll increase effective July 1, 2004, on all toll bridges in the bay area, except the Golden Gate Bridge?”

(c) The ballot pamphlet for the special election described in subdivision (b)
 shall include a detailed description of the Regional Traffic Relief Plan detailing the projects, services, and planning requirements set forth in subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 30914 and subdivisions (d), (e), and (f) of Section 30914.5. The Metropolitan Transportation Commission shall prepare this description of the Regional Traffic Relief Plan.

(d) The county clerks shall report the results of the special election to the authority. If a majority of all voters voting on the question at the special election vote affirmatively, the authority shall adopt the increased toll schedule to be effective July 1, 2004.

(e) If a majority of all the voters voting on the question at the special election do not approve the toll increase, the authority may by resolution resubmit the measure to the voters at a subsequent general election. If a majority of all of the voters vote affirmatively
 on the measure, the authority may adopt the toll increase and establish its effective date and establish the completion dates for all reports and studies required by Sections 30914, 30914.5, and 30950.3.

(f) The authority shall reimburse each county and city and county participating in the election for the incremental cost of submitting the measure to the voters. These costs shall be reimbursed from revenues derived from the tolls if the measure is approved by the voters, or, if the measure is not approved, from any bridge toll revenues administered by the authority.

(g) Except as provided in Section 30918, the toll rates contained in a toll schedule adopted by the authority pursuant to this section shall not be changed without statutory authorization by the Legislature.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 715, Sec. 74.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

30922.

Any action or proceeding to contest, question, or deny the validity of a toll increase provided for in this chapter, the financing of the transportation program contemplated by this chapter, the issuance of any bonds secured by those tolls, or any of the proceedings in relation thereto, shall be commenced within 60 days from the date of the election at which the toll increase is approved. After that date, the financing of the program, the issuance of the bonds, and all proceedings in relation thereto, including the adoption, approval, and collection of the toll increase, shall be held valid and incontestable in every respect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 650, Sec. 12.   (SB 595)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

30923.

(a) For purposes of the special election to be conducted pursuant to this section, the authority shall select an amount of the proposed increase in the toll rate, not to exceed three dollars ($3), for vehicles crossing the bridges described in Section 30910 to be placed on the ballot for approval by the voters.

(b) The toll rate for vehicles crossing the bridges described in Section 30910 shall not be increased by the rate selected by the authority pursuant to subdivision (a) prior to the availability of the results of a special election to be held in the City and County of San Francisco and the Counties of Alameda, Contra Costa, Marin, Napa, San Mateo, Santa Clara, Solano, and Sonoma to determine whether the residents of those counties and
 of the City and County of San Francisco approve the toll increase.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding any provision of the Elections Code, the Board of Supervisors of the City and County of San Francisco and of each of the counties described in subdivision (b) shall call a special election to be conducted in the City and County of San Francisco and in each of the counties that shall be consolidated with a statewide primary or general election, which shall be selected by the authority.

(2) The authority shall determine the ballot question, which shall include the amount of the proposed toll increase selected pursuant to subdivision (a) and a summary of the Regional Measure 3 expenditure plan. The ballot question shall be submitted to the voters as Regional Measure 3 and stated separately in the ballot from state and local measures. 

(d) The ballot pamphlet for the special election shall include a summary of the Regional Measure 3 expenditure plan regarding the eligible projects and programs to be funded pursuant to Section 30914.7. The Metropolitan Transportation Commission shall prepare a summary of the Regional Measure 3 expenditure plan.

(e) The county clerks shall report the results of the special election to the authority. If a majority of all voters voting on the question at the special election vote affirmatively, the authority may phase in the increased toll schedule consistent with subdivision (c) of Section 30916.

(f) If a majority of all the voters voting on the question at the special election do not approve the toll increase, the authority may by resolution resubmit the measure to the voters at a subsequent statewide primary or general
 election. If a majority of all of the voters vote affirmatively on the measure, the authority may adopt the toll increase and establish its effective date and establish the completion dates for all reports and studies required by Sections 30914.7 and 30950.3. 

(g) (1) Each county and city and county shall share translation services for the ballot pamphlet and shall provide the authority a certified invoice that details the incremental cost of including the measure on the ballot, as well as the total costs associated with the election.

(2) The authority shall reimburse each county and city and county participating in the election for the incremental cost of submitting the measure to the voters. These costs shall be reimbursed from revenues derived from the tolls if the measure is
 approved by the voters, or, if the measure is not approved, from any bridge toll revenues administered by the authority.

(h) (1) If the voters approve a toll increase pursuant to this section, the authority shall establish an independent oversight committee within six months of the effective date of the toll increase to ensure that any toll revenues generated pursuant to this section are expended consistent with the applicable requirements set forth in Section 30914.7.

(2) The oversight
 committee shall include two representatives from each county within the jurisdiction of the commission. Each representative shall be appointed by the applicable county board of supervisors and serve a four-year term and shall be limited to two terms. The oversight committee shall annually review the expenditure of funds by the authority for the projects and programs specified in Section 30914.7 and prepare and submit a report to the transportation committee of each house of the Legislature summarizing its findings. The oversight committee may request any documents from the authority to assist the committee in performing its functions.

(3) A representative appointed to the oversight committee shall not be a member, former member, staff, or former staff of the commission or the authority, shall not be employed by any organization or person that has received or is
 receiving funding from the commission or the authority, and shall not be a former employee or a person who has contracted with any organization or person that has received or is receiving funding from the commission or the authority within one year of having worked for or contracted with that organization or person.

(i) If voters approve a toll increase pursuant to this section, the authority shall annually prepare a report to the Legislature, in conformance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, on the status of the projects and programs funded pursuant to Section 30914.7.

(j) Except as provided in subdivision (c) of Section 30916 and Section 30918, the toll increase adopted by the authority pursuant to this section shall not be changed without statutory authorization by the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 16, Sec. 1.   (AB 1041)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4.3. Metropolitan Transportation Commission [30950. - 30963.]

30950.

For the purposes of this chapter, Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 30910), and Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 31000), “the authority” is the Bay Area Toll Authority, which is hereby created. The authority is a public instrumentality governed by the same board as that governing the Metropolitan Transportation Commission. The authority is, however, a separate entity from the Metropolitan Transportation Commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 715, Sec. 76.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

30950.1.

The authority shall adopt an annual budget. The members of the authority shall be compensated as determined by the authority and shall be reimbursed for necessary and reasonable expenses incurred in connection with performing authority duties. The authority shall pay all costs required by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 715, Sec. 77.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

30950.2.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the authority is responsible for the administration of all toll revenues from state-owned toll bridges within the geographic jurisdiction of the Metropolitan Transportation Commission.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, until such time as obligations of the California Infrastructure and Economic Development Bank secured by the seismic retrofit surcharge imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 31010 are no longer outstanding, as that term is defined in the constituent instruments defining the rights of the holders of those obligations, both of the following apply:

(1) The phrase “toll revenues” as used in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 30910) and this chapter shall not include the seismic retrofit surcharge imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 31010.

(2) The seismic retrofit surcharge imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 31010 shall remain pledged to the payment of obligations incurred by the California Infrastructure and Economic Development Bank under Chapter 4.6 (commencing with Section 31070).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 71, Sec. 6.   Effective July 18, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

30950.3.

(a) The authority shall prepare, adopt, and from time to time revise, a long-range bridge toll plan for the completion of all projects within its jurisdiction, including those of the Regional Traffic Relief Plan described in subdivision (c) of Section 30914 and the Regional Measure 3 expenditure plan described in subdivision (a) of Section 30914.7.

(b) The authority shall give first priority to projects and expenditures that are deemed necessary by the department and the authority to preserve and protect the bridge structures.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 650, Sec. 14.   (SB 595)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

30950.4.

All authority of the California Transportation Commission as to the bay area bridges is transferred to the authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 715, Sec. 80.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

30951.

The authority is authorized in its own name to do all acts necessary or convenient for the exercise of its powers under this division and the financing of projects, including, but not limited to, the following:

(a) To make and enter into contracts.

(b) To employ agents or employees.

(c) To acquire, construct, manage, maintain, lease, or operate any public facility or improvements.

(d) To sue and be sued in its own name.

(e) To issue bonds and otherwise to incur debts, liabilities, or obligations.

(f) To apply for, accept, receive, and disburse grants, loans, and other assistance from any agency of the United States of America or of the State of California.

(g) To invest any money not required for the immediate necessities of the authority, as the authority determines is advisable.

(h) To apply for letters of credit or other forms of financial guarantees in order to secure the repayment of bonds and to enter into agreements in connection with those letters of credit or financial guarantees.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 715, Sec. 82.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

30951.1.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the authority is not authorized to purchase or otherwise acquire, directly or indirectly, including, but not limited to, through a joint exercise of powers authority between the authority and any other entity, office space and office facilities in addition to the office space and office facilities located at 390 Main Street in San Francisco.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 603, Sec. 1.   (SB 613)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

30952.

The department shall collect tolls, operate, maintain, and provide rehabilitation of all bridges described in Section 30910, including toll facilities, and be responsible for the design and construction of improvements on those bridges in accordance with programming and scheduling requirements adopted by the authority. The department and the authority shall enter into a cooperative agreement upon terms and conditions that they shall deem mutually agreeable, including, without limitation, provisions for the department to provide for the operation of the bridges and the planning, design, and construction of improvements to the bridges paid for by revenues from tolls collected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 328, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

30952.05.

(a) The authority and the department shall amend the cooperative agreement required by Section 30952 to incorporate the project oversight and control responsibilities described in this section relative to the construction of the Benicia-Martinez Bridge, as described in Section 30917, and the state toll bridge seismic retrofit program, as described in Section 188.5 as that section read on January 1, 2005.

(b) The department shall develop specifications and bid documents and invite bids and award contracts for the Benicia-Martinez Bridge, as described in Section 30917, and the state toll bridge seismic retrofit program projects. All contract specifications and bid documents shall be reviewed and approved by the authority prior to their release.

(c) The Toll Bridge Program Oversight Committee, created pursuant to Section 30952.1, shall implement a project oversight and project control process for the Benicia-Martinez Bridge project and the state toll bridge seismic retrofit program projects. The committee’s project oversight and control processes shall include, but not be limited to, reviewing bid specifications and documents, providing field staff to review ongoing costs, reviewing and approving significant change orders and claims (as determined by the committee), and preparing project reports.

(d) The authority may contract with, and oversee, one or more consulting firms to provide the services described in subdivision (c) and subdivision (a) of Section 30952.1. All contracts shall be reviewed and approved by the committee prior to their execution. The authority’s expenses incurred for project oversight and control services may be reimbursed by toll revenue collected pursuant to Section 30916, 31010, or 31011.

(e) To ensure that the department manages the risks associated with the toll bridge seismic retrofit projects, the department shall, at a minimum, take all of the following actions:

(1) Establish a comprehensive risk management plan that clearly defines roles and responsibilities for risk management and addresses the process by which it will identify and quantify project risks, implement and track risk response activities, and monitor and control risks throughout the duration of the project.

(2) Quantify the effect of identified risks in financial terms.

(3) Develop and maintain documents to track identified risks and related mitigation steps.

(4) Regularly update its estimates of capital and capital outlay support costs.

(5) Regularly reassess its reserves for potential claims and unknown risks, incorporating information related to risks identified and quantified through its risk assessment processes.

(6) Regularly integrate estimates for capital, capital outlay support costs, and contingency reserves into a programwide report.

(7) Ensure that reports to the Federal Highway Administration and others reflect current data and provide an accurate representation of the project’s status.

(8) When unexpected events occur, quickly inform the committee created in Section 30952.1 describing the effects of these key events on the project’s overall budget and schedule.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 71, Sec. 7.   Effective July 18, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

30952.1.

(a) The authority and the department shall establish a Toll Bridge Program Oversight Committee, which shall consist of the director, the authority’s executive director, and the Executive Director of the California Transportation Commission. The committee may establish a project management team to assist it in performing the duties required of it under this section and Section 30952.05.

(b) The Toll Bridge Program Oversight Committee shall review project status, program costs, and schedules; resolve project issues; evaluate project changes; develop and regularly update cost estimates, risk assessments, and cashflow requirements for all phases of
 the toll bridge projects; and provide program direction.

(c) In addition to the duties described in subdivision (b), the committee shall review project staffing levels and structures, and consultant and contractor services related to the Benicia-Martinez Bridge construction project, as described in Section 30917, and the state toll bridge seismic retrofit program, as described in Section 188.5.

(d) Expenses incurred by the department, the authority, and the California Transportation Commission for costs directly related to duties required by this section, Section 30952, and Section 30952.05 shall be reimbursed by toll revenue collected pursuant to Section 30916, 31010, or 31011.

(e) The Toll Bridge Program Oversight Committee shall be subject to the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 375) by Stats. 2015, Ch. 172, Sec. 1.   (AB 1284)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

30952.2.

(a) The department shall provide monthly reports to the Toll Bridge Program Oversight Committee, including, but not limited to, the construction status, actual expenditures, and forecasted costs and schedules for the Benicia-Martinez Bridge construction project and the state toll bridge seismic retrofit program projects.

(b) (1) Commencing August 15, 2005, and quarterly thereafter until completion of all applicable projects, the Toll Bridge Program Oversight Committee shall provide quarterly reports within 45 days of the end of each quarter to the transportation and fiscal committees of both houses of the Legislature and the California Transportation Commission for the toll bridge seismic retrofit program in subdivision (a) of Section 188.5.

(2) The report shall include details of each toll bridge seismic retrofit project and all information necessary to clearly describe the status of the project, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) A progress report.

(B) The baseline budget for capital and capital outlay support costs for the revised program cost estimate, as described in Section 188.6.

(C) The current or projected budget for capital and capital outlay support costs.

(D) Expenditures to date for capital and capital outlay support costs.

(E) A comparison of the current or projected schedule and the baseline schedule that was assumed.

(F) A summary of milestones achieved during the quarterly period and any issues identified and actions taken to address those issues.

(G) A summary of the expenses incurred by the Toll Bridge Program Oversight Committee to perform the duties required by Sections 30952.05 and 30952.1.

(H) A summary of the incentives, disincentives, and criteria for each utilized by the department, and the expenses incurred by the department, pursuant to Section 30952.3.

(3) The report described in paragraph (1) shall also include a programwide summary of the program’s budget status for capital and capital outlay support costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 375, Sec. 3.   Effective September 29, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

30952.3.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the department may, from the resources provided in, and for the purpose of, Sections 188.5 and 188.6, include incentives or disincentives, or both, to maximize the number of bidders participating in a bid process relative to toll bridge seismic retrofit and replacement projects, and to encourage the timely and thorough completion of contracts awarded for those projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 375, Sec. 4.   Effective September 29, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

30953.

Toll revenues and all other income derived from bridges pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 30910) shall be deposited in the Bay Area Toll Account, which is hereby created.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 71, Sec. 11.   Effective July 18, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

30954.

At such time as obligations of the California Infrastructure and Economic Development Bank secured by the seismic retrofit surcharge imposed under subdivision (a) of Section 31010 are no longer outstanding, as that term is defined in the constituent instruments defining the rights of the holders of those obligations, all revenues, interest earned, and existing fund balances in the Toll Bridge Seismic Retrofit Account shall be transferred to the authority for deposit in the Bay Area Toll Account.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 71, Sec. 12.   Effective July 18, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

30958.

After payments for debt service on outstanding bonds, and the costs for the operation and maintenance expenses set forth in Section 30952 are provided for, and after all direct operating costs of the authority are provided for, the authority may retain, for its cost in administering this article, an amount not to exceed 1 percent of the gross annual bridge revenues.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 715, Sec. 85.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

30959.

The authority may make direct contributions to the commission in furtherance of the exercise of the authority’s powers under this division, including contributions in the form of personnel services, office space, overhead, and other funding necessary to carry out the function of the authority, with those contributions not to exceed 1 percent of the gross annual bridge revenues. The authority may also make additional contributions in the form of loans to the commission on a reimbursement-for-cost basis; provided that those loans do not, independent of the direct contributions, exceed 1 percent of the gross annual bridge revenues and are fully repaid with interest at the same interest rate that would apply for toll bridge revenue bonds of the same duration as any loan
 taken by the commission. As used in this section, “gross annual bridge revenues” shall have the same meaning as in Section 30958.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 603, Sec. 2.   (SB 613)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

30960.

(a) The authority may issue both defeasance and future capital project bonds payable from the revenues of the tolls imposed on the bridges described in Section 30910. The bonds or commercial paper may be issued by the authority at any time, and from time to time, payable from the revenues from the tolls. The bonds or commercial paper shall be referred to as “toll bridge revenue bonds.”

(b) The revenues from the tolls on the bridges described in Section 30910 shall be subject to a statutory lien in favor of the bondholders to secure all amounts due on the bonds and in favor of any provider of credit enhancement for the bonds to secure all amounts due to that provider with respect to those bonds, and the lien shall immediately attach to those toll revenues and be effective, binding, and enforceable against the authority, its successors, creditors, and all others asserting rights therein, irrespective of whether those parties have notice of the lien and without the need for any physical delivery, recordation, filing, or further act, and the toll revenues shall remain subject to that lien until all bonds are paid in full or provision made therefor, and the bridges shall not become toll-free prior to that time.

(c) The liens on toll revenues created by this chapter shall be subject to expenditures for operation and maintenance of the bridges, including toll collection, unless those expenditures are otherwise provided for by statute.

(d) Interest on any bonds issued pursuant to this chapter shall at all times be free from state personal income tax and corporate income tax.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 715, Sec. 86.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

30961.

Toll bridge revenue bonds shall be issued pursuant to a resolution adopted at any time, and from time to time, by the authority by a majority vote of all members of the authority.

(a) The authority may from time to time issue bonds in accordance with the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 54300) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code), for the purpose of constructing, improving, or equipping any of the bridges or for any of the purposes authorized by this chapter, Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 30910), or Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 31000). Operation of the bridges or any grouping or units thereof shall constitute an “enterprise” within the meaning of Section 54309 of the Government Code, and the authority shall constitute a “local agency” within the meaning of Section 54307 of the Government Code. Article 3 (commencing with Section 54380) of Chapter 6 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code shall not apply to the issuance and sale of bonds pursuant to this chapter. Instead, the authority shall authorize the issuance of bonds by resolution, and that resolution shall specify all of the following:

(1) The purposes for which the bonds are to be issued.

(2) The maximum principal amount of the bonds.

(3) The maximum term for the bonds or commercial paper.

(4) The maximum rate of interest to be payable upon the bonds or commercial paper. That interest rate shall not exceed the maximum rate specified in Section 53531 of the Government Code. The rate may be either fixed or variable and shall be payable at the times and in the manner specified in the resolution.

(b) The authority shall keep full and complete accounts for toll revenues and expenses of the toll bridges and shall annually prepare balance sheets showing the financial condition of the entire toll bridge enterprise as well as toll revenues and operating costs for each toll bridge. The accounts and related reports shall be maintained and prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting practices and shall be subject to an annual audit conducted by an independent certified public accountancy firm licensed to practice in the state.

(c) The authority may issue toll bridge revenue bonds to provide the department with sufficient funds to combine with the unspent proceeds of outstanding obligations of the California Infrastructure and Economic Development Bank under Chapter 4.6 (commencing with Section 31070) to establish that those obligations are no longer outstanding, as that term is defined in the constituent instruments defining the rights of the holders of those obligations.

(d) As and when requested by the authority, the department and the California Infrastructure and Economic Development Bank shall take all actions necessary or appropriate to promptly establish that obligations of the bank under Chapter 4.6 (commencing with Section 31070) are no longer outstanding and to effect the consolidation of toll revenues in accordance with Section 188.6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 71, Sec. 13.   Effective July 18, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

30961.1.

Not later than December 31, 2005, the California Transportation Commission, in consultation with the department and the authority, shall adopt a schedule for the payment of the remaining state contributions identified in Sections 188.5 and 188.6 for the toll bridge seismic retrofit and replacement projects identified in Section 188.5. The schedule shall include the timing and sources of the state contributions to the state toll bridge seismic retrofit and replacement program. The schedule shall provide for the state contributions to be made available for expenditure commencing in the fiscal year 2005-06, and in a manner that distributes the state contributions over the years during which construction of the toll bridge seismic retrofit and replacement program occurs, ensures that the state contributions provide a timely balance between those sources and the contribution from toll revenues, and, to the extent possible, minimizes the impact on state transportation programs. The schedule shall include and make available for expenditure, the state contribution identified in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (8) of subdivision (b) of Section 188.5 commencing in fiscal year 2008-09, and shall distribute it over that fiscal year and each of the fiscal years during which construction of the state toll bridge seismic retrofit and replacement program occurs. The California Transportation Commission, in consultation with the department and the authority, may update and revise the schedule as it determines is necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 375, Sec. 5.   Effective September 29, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

30962.

Any bonds or commercial paper issued pursuant to this chapter are a legal investment for all trust funds; for the funds of insurance companies, commercial and savings banks, and trust companies; and for state school funds. Whenever any money or funds may, by any law now or hereafter enacted, be invested in bonds of cities, counties, school districts, or other districts within the state, those funds may be invested in the bonds issued pursuant to this chapter, and whenever bonds of cities, counties, school districts, or other districts within this state may, by any law now or hereafter enacted, be used as security for the performance of any act or the deposit of any public money, the bonds issued pursuant to this chapter may be so used. The provisions of this chapter are in addition to all other laws relating to legal investments and shall be controlling as the latest expression of the Legislature with respect thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 328, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

30963.

(a) The State of California pledges and agrees with the holders of the bonds issued pursuant to this chapter, and with those parties who may enter into contracts with the authority pursuant to this chapter, that the state will not limit, alter, or restrict the rights hereby vested in the authority to finance the toll bridge improvements authorized by this chapter, Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 30910), or Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 31000). The State of California pledges and agrees not to impair the terms of any agreements made with the holders of bonds, and with the parties who may enter into contracts with the authority pursuant to this chapter, and pledges and agrees not to impair the rights or remedies of the holders of any revenue bonds or any parties until the bonds, together with interest, are fully paid and discharged and any contracts are fully performed on the part of the authority.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to pledge the full faith and credit of the State of California.

(c) The authority may include the pledges made pursuant to this section in its revenue bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 328, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4.5. Seismic Retrofit Surcharge [31000. - 31021.]

31000.

The following definitions apply for purposes of this chapter:

(a) “Account” means the Toll Bridge Seismic Retrofit Account created pursuant to Section 188.10.

(b) “Amenities” means any of the following:

(1) A cable suspension bridge.

(2) A bicycle facility.

(3) A transbay terminal.

(c) “Authority” means the Bay Area Toll Authority.

(d) “Bay area bridges” means the state-owned toll bridges within the area of the geographic jurisdiction of the Metropolitan Transportation Commission.

(e) “Department” means the Department of Transportation.

(f) “Seismic retrofit” means all work completed by the department on the bay area bridges relating to the planning, design, and construction of improvements to, or replacement of, those bridges for the purpose of withstanding seismic forces, including, but not limited to, any environmental or traffic mitigation necessary for that work.

(g) “Surcharge” means the seismic retrofit surcharge imposed pursuant to Section 31010.
